Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 2 Sales and Conveyances

53-8-10.
Authority of personal representative; petition by temporary administrator.

Subject to the provisions of this article, a personal representative may sell, rent, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of property, whether personal, real, or mixed, for the purpose of payment of debts, for distribution of the estate, or for any other purpose that is in the best interest of the estate; provided, however, that nothing in this article shall be construed to limit, enlarge, or change any authority, power, restriction, or privilege specifically provided by will or incorporated into a will or otherwise granted to the personal representative in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 53-7-1.

A temporary administrator is authorized to petition the probate court for leave to sell or otherwise deal with property of the estate following the procedures described in this article, provided that good cause is shown.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-55/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “estate,” for “estate;”, substituted “estate; provided, however,” for “estate, provided”; and, in subsection (b), substituted “article, provided, that” for “article; provided, however, that”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, the comma after “article, provided” in subsection (b) was deleted.

53-8-11.
Property that is perishable, liable to deteriorate, or expensive to keep.

Perishable property, property that is liable to deteriorate from keeping, or property that is expensive to keep shall be sold as early as practicable and in such manner as the probate court shall determine to be in the best interest of the estate, after such service of notice and opportunity for hearing, if any, as the probate court shall deem practicable under the circumstances.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-56/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “service of” in this Code section.

53-8-12.
Stocks or bonds.

Stocks or bonds, either listed or admitted to unlisted trading privileges upon any stock exchange or quoted regularly in any newspaper having a general circulation in Georgia, may be sold at private sale without order from or report to the probate court at a sales price not less than the stock exchange bid price or the published bid price at the time of sale. Reasonable brokerage commissions, not in excess of those customarily charged by stock exchange members, may be paid.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-8-13.
General procedures.

A personal representative desiring to sell, rent, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of property other than property that is perishable, liable to deteriorate, or expensive to keep or listed stocks and bonds shall file a petition with the probate court stating the property involved and the interests in such property; the specific purpose of the transaction; the proposed price, if any; and all other terms or conditions proposed for the transaction and listing the names, addresses, and ages or majority status of all heirs of an intestate estate or of all beneficiaries of a testate estate. In the event full particulars are lacking, the petition shall state the reasons for any such omission.

Upon the filing of the petition by the personal representative, the court shall issue a citation and serve notice on the heirs of an intestate estate or the affected beneficiaries of a testate estate in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 11 of this title.

If no written objection by a person so served with notice is filed within the appropriate period of time following the service of such notice, as provided by Chapter 11 of this title, the probate court shall order such sale summarily in the manner and terms petitioned. If timely written objection is filed, the court shall hear the matter and grant or deny the petition for sale or make such other order as is in the best interest of the estate, which may require the sale to be private or at public outcry including confirmation of the sale by the court or otherwise. An appeal shall lie to the superior court in the manner, under the restrictions, and with the effect provided for appeals from the probate court in other cases.

A personal representative shall make a full return to the probate court of every sale, specifying the property sold, the purchasers, the amounts received, and the terms of the sale.

The recital in the personal representative’s deed of compliance with the provisions of this Code section shall be prima-facie evidence of the facts recited.

Where a personal representative sells real property under the provisions of this Code section, liens on such real property may be divested and transferred to the proceeds of the sale as a condition of the sale.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 25; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-57/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted a semicolon for a comma three times, substituted “listing the” for “a list of”, substituted “all heirs of” for “heirs in”, and substituted “all beneficiaries of” for “beneficiaries in”; in subsection (b), substituted “the filing of the petition by the personal representative, the court shall issue a citation and serve notice on” for “filing the petition, notice shall be given to”; in subsection (c), in the first sentence, substituted “served with notice” for “notified” and inserted “the service of such”; and, in subsection (e), substituted “the provisions of this Code section” for “legal provisions”.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decisions in Patterson v. Lemon,

50 Ga. 231

(1873); Newsom v. Carlton,

59 Ga. 516

(1877); Barrett & Caswell v. Durham,

80 Ga. 336

,

5 S.E. 102

(1887); Whitehurst v. Mason,

140 Ga. 148

,

78 S.E. 938

(1913).

Cross references.

Livestock dealers and auctions, T. 4, C. 6.

Regulation of advertising generally, §

10-1-420

et seq.

Age of majority, §

39-1-1

.

Abolition of dower, §

53-1-3

.

Guardians ad litem and appraisers for year’s support in probate court proceedings, Uniform Rules for the Probate Courts, Rule 23.

Law reviews.

For article discussing methods of summary distribution and settlement of decedent’s estate, see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-8-14.
Warranty; personal liability of personal representative.

Regardless of whether a personal representative has the powers provided by paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 53-12-261 or by the corresponding provision of any statute incorporated pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 53-12-263 or otherwise has similar such powers, and regardless of whether such powers are granted by a probate court or are enumerated in or incorporated by reference into a will by a testator, a personal representative may not bind the estate by any warranty in any conveyance or contract.

A personal representative shall not be bound personally by any warranty in any conveyance or contract, unless the intention to create a personal liability is distinctly expressed.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-58/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote this Code section, which read: “A personal representative may not bind the estate by any warranty in any conveyance or contract, nor shall a personal representative be personally bound by such covenant, unless the intention to create a personal liability is distinctly expressed.”

53-8-15.
Passage of title to heirs or beneficiaries; assent of personal representative.

The title to all property of an estate being in the personal representative for the payment of debts and other purposes of administration, title to property in the estate does not pass to the heirs or beneficiaries until the personal representative assents thereto in evidence of the distribution of the property to them, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 53-2-7.

Such assent may be express or may be presumed from the conduct of the personal representative. Assent should be evidenced in writing as a deed of conveyance to real property, bill of sale conveying tangible personal property, or an assignment or transfer of interests in intangible personal property.

In the absence of prior assent, the discharge of a personal representative shall be conclusive evidence of the personal representative’s assent.

At any time after the lapse of one year from the date of qualification of the personal representative, an heir or beneficiary who is entitled to the distribution of property from an estate may, personally or by a guardian or conservator:

Cite the personal representative in the probate court to show cause why assent should not be given after service of notice in accordance with Chapter 11 of this title; and

Subject to Code Section 23-1-4, compel such assent by an equitable proceeding.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-8-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 42; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-59/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (d), substituted “a guardian or conservator: (1) Cite” for “guardian, cite”, and substituted “after service of notice in accordance with Chapter 11 of this title; and (2) Subject to Code Section 23-1-4,” for “and may”.

Law reviews.

For article advocating uniform treatment of the devolution of title, and abolition of distinctions based on the form of wealth or the fact of intestacy, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (2009).